Missouri, session 2026, SB1595.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 192.300, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 192.300,
to read as follows:
192.300. 1. The county commissions and the county
health center boards of the several counties may make and
promulgate orders, ordinances, rules or regulations,
respectively as will tend to enhance the public health and
prevent the entrance of infectious, contagious, communicable
or dangerous diseases into such county, but any orders,
ordinances, rules or regulations shall not[:
(1)] be in conflict with any rules or regulations
authorized and made by the department of health and senior
services in accordance with this chapter or by the
department of social services under chapter 198[; or
(2) Impose standards or requirements on an
agricultural operation and its appurtenances, as such term
is defined in section 537.295, that are inconsistent with,
in addition to, different from, or more stringent than any
provision of this chapter or chapters 260, 640, 643, and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1595 2
644, or any rule or regulation promulgated under such
chapters].
2. The county commissions and the county health center
boards of the several counties may establish reasonable fees
to pay for any costs incurred in carrying out such orders,
ordinances, rules or regulations, however, the establishment
of such fees shall not deny personal health services to
those individuals who are unable to pay such fees or impede
the prevention or control of communicable disease. Fees
generated shall be deposited in the county treasury. All
fees generated under the provisions of this section shall be
used to support the public health activities for which they
were generated.
3. After the promulgation and adoption of such orders,
ordinances, rules or regulations by such county commission
or county health board, such commission or county health
board shall make and enter an order or record declaring such
orders, ordinances, rules or regulations to be printed and
available for distribution to the public in the office of
the county clerk, and shall require a copy of such order to
be published in some newspaper in the county in three
successive weeks, not later than thirty days after the entry
of such order, ordinance, rule or regulation.
4. Any person, firm, corporation or association which
violates any of the orders or ordinances adopted,
promulgated and published by such county commission is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be prosecuted, tried and
fined as otherwise provided by law. The county commission
or county health board of any such county has full power and
authority to initiate the prosecution of any action under
this section.

SB 1595 3
5. Any orders, ordinances, rules, or regulations made
and promulgated under the authority in this section shall
comply with the provisions of section 67.265.
✓